New Jersey, session 221, A4980.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person shall not sell, give, transfer, assign or otherwise dispose of ammunition, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2007, c.318 (C.2C:58-3.3), in a manner that dispenses the ammunition to a consumer from a vending machine. As used in this section, vending machine means a machine or other mechanical device that accepts payment and directly dispenses an item to a consumer. b.    A violation of this section is a crime of the fourth degree. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.